Utah statutes.
34A-2-205 (Superseded 07/01/10).   Notification of workers' compensation
insurance coverage to division -- Cancellation requirements -- Penalty for
violation.
(1) (a)  Every insurance carrier writing workers' compensation insurance
coverage in this state or for this state, regardless of the state in which the
policy is written, shall file notification of that coverage with the division
or its designee within 30 days after the inception date of the policy in the
form prescribed by the division.
(b)  A policy described in Subsection (1)(a) is in effect from inception until
canceled by filing with the division or its designee a notification of
cancellation in the form prescribed by the division within 10 days after the
cancellation of a policy.
(c)  Failure to notify the division or its designee under Subsection (1)(b)
will result in the continued liability of the carrier until the date that
notice of cancellation is received by the division or its designee.
(d)  Filings shall be made within 30 days of:
(i)  the reinstatement of a policy;
(ii)  the changing or addition of a name or address of the insured; or
(iii)  the merger of an insured with another entity.
(e)  All filings under this section shall include:
(i)  the name of the insured;
(ii)  the principal business address;
(iii)  any and all assumed name designations;
(iv)  the address of all locations within this state where business is
conducted; and
(v)  all federal employer identification numbers or federal tax identification
numbers.
(2)  Noncompliance with this section is grounds for revocation of an insurance
carrier's certificate of authority in addition to the grounds specified in
Title 31A, Insurance Code.
(3)  The division may assess an insurer up to $150, payable to the Uninsured
Employers' Fund, if the insurer fails to comply with this section.
(4) (a)  The notification of workers' compensation insurance coverage required
to be filed under Subsection (1) is a protected record under Section
63G-2-305.
(b)  The commission or any of its divisions may not disclose the information
described in Subsection (4)(a) except as provided in:
(i) Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and Management Act, for a
protected record; or
(ii)  Subsection (4)(c), notwithstanding whether Title 63G, Chapter 2,
Government Records Access and Management Act, permits disclosure.
(c)  The commission may disclose the information described in Subsection
(4)(a) if:
(i)  the information is disclosed on an individual case basis related to a
single employer;
(ii)  the information facilitates the:
(A)  coverage of subcontractors by identifying the insurance carrier providing
workers' compensation coverage for an employer;
(B)  filing of a claim by an employee; or
(C)  payment of services rendered on an employee's claim by a medical
practitioner; and
(iii)  promotes the purposes of this chapter or Chapter 3, Utah Occupational
Disease Act.
(d)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commission shall make rules concerning when information may be
disclosed under Subsection (4)(c).
